apertium-sh-mk/apertium-sh-mk.sh.dix.xml
    <pardef n="inženjer__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ima</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ima</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ima</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="grad__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ova</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovima</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ove</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovima</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovima</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="administrator__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ima</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ima</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ima</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="požar__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ima</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ima</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ima</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="gramofon"><i>gramofon</i><par n="požar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="požar"><i>požar</i><par n="požar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spis"><i>spis</i><par n="požar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="subok"><i>subok</i><par n="požar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="veteran"><i>veteran</i><par n="požar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="požar"><i>požar</i><par n="požar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zarez"><i>zarez</i><par n="požar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="duhan"><i>duhan</i><par n="požar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="problem"><i>problem</i><par n="požar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="most"><i>most</i><par n="grad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="klub"><i>klub</i><par n="grad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grad"><i>grad</i><par n="grad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zbor"><i>zbor</i><par n="grad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dim"><i>dim</i><par n="grad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plin"><i>plin</i><par n="grad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="med"><i>med</i><par n="grad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pod"><i>pod</i><par n="grad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vrt"><i>vrt</i><par n="grad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spol"><i>spol</i><par n="grad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zid"><i>zid</i><par n="grad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="but"><i>but</i><par n="grad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rat"><i>rat</i><par n="grad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grb"><i>grb</i><par n="grad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dlan"><i>dlan</i><par n="grad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trup"><i>trup</i><par n="grad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="džem"><i>džem</i><par n="grad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kat"><i>kat</i><par n="grad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stan"><i>stan</i><par n="grad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="administrator"><i>administrator</i><par n="administrator__n"/></e>
    <e lm="doktor"><i>doktor</i><par n="administrator__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lider"><i>lider</i><par n="administrator__n"/></e>
    <e lm="frizer"><i>frizer</i><par n="inženjer__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zubar"><i>zubar</i><par n="inženjer__n"/></e>
    <e lm="štakor"><i>štakor</i><par n="inženjer__n"/></e>
    <e lm="inženjer"><i>inženjer</i><par n="inženjer__n"/></e>
    <e lm="inžinjer"><i>inžinjer</i><par n="inženjer__n"/></e>
    <e lm="političar"><i>političar</i><par n="inženjer__n"/></e>
